Virginia statutes. Title 46.2. Motor Vehicles.
Article 18.
Arrest of Nonresidents.

§ 46.2-944. Definitions.

As used in this article:

"Jurisdiction"
means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

"Home jurisdiction"
means the jurisdiction that issued the driver's license of the traffic violator.

"Issuing jurisdiction"
means the jurisdiction in which the traffic citation was issued to the motorist.

"Party jurisdiction"
means any jurisdiction which by its laws or by written agreement with the Commonwealth extends to residents of Virginia substantially the rights and privileges provided by this article.

"Court"
means a court of law or traffic tribunal.

"Citation"
means any summons, ticket, or other official document issued by a police officer for a traffic violation containing an order which requires the motorist to respond.

"Terms of the citation"
means those options expressly stated upon the citation.

"Compliance"
means the motorist must appear for a hearing and/or pay court fines and costs.

"Driver's license"
means any license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle issued under the laws of the home jurisdiction.

"Collateral"
or

"bond"

means any cash or other security deposited to secure an appearance for trial, following the issuance by a police officer of a citation for a traffic violation.

"Personal recognizance"
means a signed agreement by a motorist made at the time of issuance of the traffic citation that he will comply with the terms of that traffic citation.

"Motorist"
means a driver of a motor vehicle operating in a party jurisdiction other than the home jurisdiction.

"Police officer"
means any individual authorized by the party jurisdiction to issue a citation for a traffic violation.

(1964, c. 247, § 46.1-179.1; 1974, c. 559; 1975, c. 205; 1980, c. 366; 1989, c. 727.)

§ 46.2-945. Issuance of citation to motorist; party jurisdiction; police officer to report noncompliance with citation.

When issuing a citation for a traffic violation, a police officer shall issue the citation to a motorist who is a resident of or holds a driver's license issued by a party jurisdiction and shall not, subject to the exceptions noted in subsection C of this section, require such motorist to post collateral or bond to secure appearance for trial, but shall accept such motorist's written promise that he will comply with the terms of such citation; provided, however, the motorist shall have the right upon his request to post collateral or bond in a manner provided by law and, in such case, the provisions of this article shall not apply.

In the absence of the motorist's written promise, the officer shall proceed according to the provisions of § 46.2-940.

No motorist shall be entitled to receive a citation under the terms of subsection A of this section nor shall any police officer issue such citation under the same in the event the offense for which the citation is issued shall be one of the following: (i) an offense for which the issuance of a citation in lieu of a hearing or the posting of collateral or bond is prohibited by the laws of this Commonwealth; or (ii) an offense, the conviction of or the forfeiture of collateral for which requires the revocation of the motorist's license.

Upon the failure of any motorist to comply with the terms of a traffic citation, the police officer or the appropriate official shall report this fact to the Department of Motor Vehicles. Such report shall clearly identify the motorist; describe the violation, specifying the section of the statute, code or ordinance violated; shall indicate the location of the offense, give description of vehicle involved, and show the registration or license number of the vehicle. Such report shall be signed by the police officer or appropriate official.

(1964, c. 247, § 46.1-179.2; 1972, c. 474; 1976, c. 7; 1980, c. 366; 1981, c. 382; 1989, c. 727.)

§ 46.2-946. Department to transmit officer's report to party jurisdiction; suspension of resident's license for noncompliance with citation issued by party jurisdiction.

Upon receipt of the report as described in §

46.2-945

, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall transmit a certified copy of such report to the official in charge of the issuance of driver's licenses in the home jurisdiction in which the motorist resides or by which he is licensed.

Upon receipt from the issuing jurisdiction of a certification of noncompliance with a citation by a motorist holding a driver's license issued by this Commonwealth, the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles forthwith shall suspend such motorist's driver's license.
The order of suspension shall indicate the reason for the order, and shall notify the motorist that his license shall remain suspended until he has furnished evidence satisfactory to the Commissioner that he has fully complied with the terms of the citation which was the basis for the suspension order.

The licensing authority of the issuing jurisdiction may suspend the privilege of a motorist for whom a report has been transmitted.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles to ascertain and remain informed as to which jurisdictions are party jurisdictions hereunder and, accordingly, to maintain a current listing of such jurisdictions, which listing he shall from time to time cause to be disseminated among the appropriate departments, divisions, bureaus and agencies of this Commonwealth, the principal executive officers of the several counties, cities and towns of this Commonwealth and the licensing authorities in all other jurisdictions which are, have been, or claim to be a party jurisdiction pursuant hereto.

Consistent with the terms of the applicable Nonresident Violator Compact, the home jurisdiction shall take no action regarding any report transmitted by the issuing jurisdiction, which is transmitted more than six months after the date on which the traffic citation was issued.

Consistent with the terms of the applicable Nonresident Violator Compact, the home jurisdiction shall take no action regarding any report on any violation where the date of issuance of the citation predates the entry into the compact for the two party jurisdictions affected.

(1964, c. 247, § 46.1-179.3; 1980, c. 366; 1989, c. 727.)